Florida, session 2026, SB816.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 1004.562, Florida Statutes, is created 23 to read: 24 1004.562âUniversity of Florida Diabetes Institute.â 25 (1)âThe University of Florida Diabetes Institute is 26 established within the University of Florida College of Medicine 27 as a resource for diabetes research, screening, prevention, 28 treatment, and education. The purpose of the institute is to 29 advance scientific discovery, improve prevention and clinical 30 care, and promote education and outreach related to all forms of 31 diabetes, including type 1 diabetes, type 2 diabetes, 32 gestational diabetes, and related metabolic conditions. 33 (2)âThe institute shall do all of the following: 34 (a)âConduct research to understand the causes, mechanisms, 35 and potential cures for diabetes, including autoimmune, genetic, 36 and environmental factors. 37 (b)âDevelop advanced prevention, diagnostic, and treatment 38 strategies to reduce the incidence and complications of diabetes 39 in children and adults. 40 (c)âProvide comprehensive, multidisciplinary clinical care 41 to individuals living with diabetes, including patient and 42 family education, nutrition counseling, mental health support, 43 and disease management resources. 44 (d)âTrain and educate health care professionals, including 45 physicians, nurses, dietitians, pharmacists, and scientists, to 46 expand expertise in diabetes care and research. 47 (e)âEstablish collaborations with state universities, 48 medical centers, patient advocacy groups, community 49 organizations, and government agencies to enhance care and 50 accelerate progress toward diabetes prevention and cures. 51 (f)âEngage in community-based outreach and education 52 programs to increase awareness, reduce disparities in diabetes 53 outcomes, and promote healthier lifestyles. 54 (3)(a)âThe institute may establish and administer statewide 55 pilot programs, including, but not limited to, population-based 56 diabetes screening, prevention initiatives, and technology 57 driven management tools. 58 (b)âThe institute shall maintain a secure data repository 59 to collect, store, and analyze deidentified data for the purpose 60 of advancing diabetes research, prevention, and care. 61 (c)âThe institute may provide deidentified data, pursuant 62 to data-sharing agreements, to research collaborators to support 63 ongoing and future scientific investigations. 64 (4)(a)âThe institute may convene a statewide diabetes 65 research and care consortium composed of clinical and academic 66 experts, health care providers, and patient representatives to 67 coordinate research, share expertise, and develop innovative 68 care models. 69 (b)âThe consortium shall, upon being convened, be 70 administered at the institute under the direction of the 71 instituteâs executive leadership. 72 (c)âThe consortium may solicit funding from public, 73 nonprofit, and private sources to expand programs, research 74 initiatives, and community services. 75 (5)âBeginning October 15, 2027, and annually thereafter, 76 the institute shall provide a report to the Governor, the 77 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 78 Representatives which includes all of the following: 79 (a)âResearch projects and findings. 80 (b)âClinical services provided and patient outcomes. 81 (c)âCommunity outreach and prevention initiatives. 82 (d)âRecommendations for future initiatives. 83 (6)âThis section shall be implemented to the extent of 84 appropriations provided in the annual General Appropriations Act 85 or from other available funds. 86 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.